Utah statutes.
57-19-18.   Investigation -- Publication.

(1)  The director may make any investigations or requests for information, within or outside of this state, that he considers necessary:

(a)  to determine whether any registration under this chapter should be granted, denied, or revoked;

(b)  to determine whether any person has violated or is about to violate any of the provisions of this chapter or any rule or order under this chapter; or

(c)  to aid in the enforcement of this chapter.

(2)  The director may publish information concerning any violation of this chapter or any rule or order under this chapter.

